Washington statutes.
RCW 43.334.070

Advisory committees or councils.

The director may appoint advisory committees or councils as required by any federal legislation as a condition to the receipt of federal funds by the department. The director may also appoint statewide committees or councils on those subject matters as are or come within the department's responsibilities. The statewide committees and councils shall have representation from both major political parties and shall have substantial consumer representation. The committees or councils shall be constituted as required by federal law or as the director may determine. The members of the committees or councils shall hold office as follows: One-third to serve one year; one-third to serve two years; and one-third to serve three years. Upon expiration of the original terms, subsequent appointments shall be for three years except in the case of a vacancy, in which event appointment shall be only for the remainder of the unexpired term for which the vacancy occurs. No member may serve more than two consecutive terms.

Members of such state advisory committees or councils may be paid their travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

[ 2005 c 333 s 7.]